Idaho, session 2025, H0434.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 3, Title 61, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 61-301B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
61-301B. LIMITATION ON CUSTOMER FUNDS BEING USED FOR POLITICAL OR LOB-
BYING ACTIVITIES -- REPORT. (1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Political expenditure" means any expenditure, contribution, pay-
ment, gift, or other form of disbursement for the purpose of:
(i) Lobbying;
(ii) Influencing the outcome of any election, referendum, or bal-
lot initiative;
(iii) Supporting or opposing political candidates, political par-
ties, or political organizations; or
(iv) Financing communications intended to influence the general
public or public officials regarding government actions, poli-
cies, or elections.
(b) The definitions provided in section 67-6602, Idaho Code, shall ap-
ply.
(2) No public utility shall recover the cost of any political expen-
diture or other politically motivated expenditure, directly or indirectly,
from its customers through any rate, fare, toll, rental, classification, or
other charge implemented by a public utility in the state of Idaho.
(3) If the public utilities commission determines that a public utility
charged its customers in violation of the prohibition under subsection (2)
of this section, the commission shall issue an order:
(a) Requiring the charges imposed in violation of this section to be re-
funded with interest and in a manner designed to allocate the refunds to
customer classes in the same proportion as the charges were originally
collected; and
(b) Imposing a fine on the public utility in an amount equal to not more
than twenty (20) times the amount that the public utility charged to
customers in violation of this section.
(4)(a) Each public utility shall file an annual report with the com-
mission disclosing all political expenditures made during the preced-
ing year. The report shall include:


(i) An itemization of all political expenditures, including the
amount, recipient, date, and purpose of each political expendi-
ture;
(ii) A signed certification by the chief operating officer of
the public utility that no funds for political expenditures were
included in any customer's rate, fare, toll, rental, classifica-
tion, or other charge implemented by such public utility; and
(iii) A description of any lobbying activities, including the leg-
islation, regulation, or public policy that the utility sought to
influence.
(b) The report shall be submitted to the commission not later than Jan-
uary 31 of each year, and the commission shall make each report avail-
able for public inspection.
(c) The commission shall compile the expenditure reports submitted un-
der this subsection into a single report that the commission shall sub-
mit to the legislative services office and the joint finance-appropria-
tions committee not later than March 1 of each year.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.